District of Columbia statutes.
8-1714

Terms.

Each member of the Soil and Water Conservation Board appointed by the Council of the District of Columbia shall serve a 2-year term, which shall expire at the conclusion of the Council period during which the Councilmember was appointed.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 17
as added Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-39, § 4, 34 DCR 5331
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 8(b), 35 DCR 147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2814.